src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! !!!Verb inflection

!! The Moksha language verbs inflect in persons.

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! !!VERBS 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON V_
+V: # ;

LEXICON V-AUX-NEG-CONJ_АФОЛЬ !!= * @CODE@ афоль:афоль
!%^Ь2ZERO
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScSg1:%>%^О1нь WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg2:%>ихтень WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg3:%>ине WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl3:%>ине WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScSg2:%>%^О1ть WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1:%>%^О1майть WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1:%>%^О1маcmь WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScSg3: WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1:%>%^О1мань WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg2:%>%^О1нзе WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1:%>%^О1мазь WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3:%>%^О1зе WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl3:%>%^О1зень WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScPl1:%>%^О1ме WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg2:%>%^О1дязь WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl2:%>%^О1дязь WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg3:%>%^О1ськ WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl3:%>%^О1ськ WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg3:%>%^О1сть WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl3:%>%^О1сть WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1:%>%^О1маcmь WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1:%>%^О1маcmь WORD-END ;

+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScPl3:%>%{Х%}ть WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg3:%>%^О1зь WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1:%>%^О1мазь WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1:%>%^О1мазь WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg2:%>%^О1дязь WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2:%>%^О1дязь WORD-END ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3:%>%^О1зь WORD-END ;

LEXICON V_ТУМС
! тумс:ту
+V+IV: V0_КУНДАМС ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! OBJECT and SUBJECT VERBS 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON TV_КУНДАМС
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@  V0_КУНДАМС ;

LEXICON TV_АНДОМС
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V0_АНДОМС ;

LEXICON TV_ПАЧКОДЕМС
!! пачкодемс:пачкодь
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V0_ПАЧКОДЕМС ;

LEXICON TV_ТИЕМС
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V0_ТИЕМС ;

LEXICON TV_НЯЕМС
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V0_НЯЕМС ; 

LEXICON TV_НЯФТЕМС_SUB
+Err/Orth: TV_НЯФТЕМС ;
LEXICON TV_НЯФТЕМС
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V0_НЯФТЕМС ;

LEXICON TV_АЛЫЯФТОМС
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V0_АЛЫЯФТОМС ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! SUBJECT ONLY VERBS 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON IV_КУНДАМС
! кундамс:кунда
+V+IV: V0_КУНДАМС ;

LEXICON IV_АНДОМС
!! андомс:анд
+V+IV: V0_АНДОМС ;

LEXICON IV_ПАЧКОДЕМС
!! пачкодемс:пачкодь
+V+IV: V0_ПАЧКОДЕМС ;

LEXICON IV_НЯФТЕМС
+V+IV: V0_НЯФТЕМС ;

LEXICON IV_АЛЫЯФТОМС
+V+IV: V0_АЛЫЯФТОМС ;

LEXICON IV_АНДОВОМС
!! андовомс:андов
+V+IV: V0_АНДОМС ;

LEXICON IV_НЯЕМС
!! няемс:ня
+V+IV: V0_НЯЕМС ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! VERBS MUTUAL FOR TV and IV !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON V0_КУНДАМС
 VERBAL-CONJUGATIONS-ALL ;
:%> Non-Finite-Vws ;
 Non-Finite-Cns ;

LEXICON V0_АНДОМС
 VERBAL-CONJUGATIONS-ALL ;
:%>%^О1 Non-Finite-Vws ;
 Non-Finite-Cns ;

LEXICON V0_ПАЧКОДЕМС
 VERBAL-CONJUGATIONS-ALL ;
:%>%^О1 Non-Finite-Vws ;
 Non-Finite-Cns ;

LEXICON V0_ТИЕМС
+Ind+Prs@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@:й0@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@	 VERB-ZERO-SC ; !!= @CODE@ This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
+Ind+Prs@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@:й0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@	 VERB-ZERO-OC2 ; !!= @CODE@ This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
+Ind+Prs@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@:00@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@	 VERB-ZERO-OC13 ; !!= @CODE@ This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
	 IND-PRT1-SC3 ; 
:й	 IND-PRT1-ALL-BUT-Sc3 ; 
:й	 IND-PRT2-ALL ; 
+Cond0000000@U.CONJ-MX.COND@:й%>%{ОЕØ%}ндяря@U.CONJ-MX.COND@ VERB-ZERO-ALL ; !! COND-ALL
+Cond:й%>%{ОЕØ%}ндяря COND-4CONJ-ALL ; !!= @CODE@ 

:й	 CONJ-ALL     	;
:й	 DES-ALL     	;
	 IMPRT-20   	;
:й	 IMPRT-ALL-BUT-20   	;
:й	 OPT-ALL       	;
:й	 INF_ОМ		;

! VERBAL-CONJUGATIONS-ALL ;
:%>%^О1 Non-Finite-Vws ;
 Non-Finite-Cns ;

LEXICON V0_НЯЕМС  !!= @CODE@ няемс:ня
+Ind+Prs@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@:й0@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@	 VERB-ZERO-SC ; !!= @CODE@ This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
+Ind+Prs@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@:й0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@	 VERB-ZERO-OC2 ; !!= @CODE@ This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
+Ind+Prs@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@:00@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@	 VERB-ZERO-OC13 ; !!= @CODE@ This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
:й	 IND-PRT1-SC3 ; !!= @CODE@ This is a difference from ТИЕМС
:й	 IND-PRT1-ALL-BUT-Sc3 ; 
:й	 IND-PRT2-ALL ; 
+Cond0000000@U.CONJ-MX.COND@:й%>%{ОЕØ%}ндяря@U.CONJ-MX.COND@ VERB-ZERO-ALL ; !! COND-ALL
+Cond:й%>%{ОЕØ%}ндяря COND-4CONJ-ALL ; !!= @CODE@ 

:й	 CONJ-ALL     	;
:й	 DES-ALL     	;
	 IMPRT-20   	;
:й	 IMPRT-ALL-BUT-20   	;
:й	 OPT-ALL       	;
:й	 INF_ОМ		;

! VERBAL-CONJUGATIONS-ALL ;
:%>%^О1 Non-Finite-Vws ;
 Non-Finite-Cns ;

LEXICON V0_НЯФТЕМС
 VERBAL-CONJUGATIONS-ALL ;
:%>%^О1 Non-Finite-Vws ;
:%> Non-Finite-Cns ;

LEXICON V0_АЛЫЯФТОМС
 VERBAL-CONJUGATIONS-ALL ;
:%>%^О1 Non-Finite-Vws ;
:%> Non-Finite-Cns ;

LEXICON Non-Finite-Vws
+Inf:%^О1мс K ;
+Inf+Loc:%^О1ма K ;
+Inf+Abl:%^О1м%>да K ;
+Inf+Abl:%^О1м%>д%^О1 OBLIQUECX-PX-ava ;
+Ger:%^О1зь K ;

LEXICON Non-Finite-Cns
+PrtPrc:%^Devoice%>ф K ;

!! !AUXILIARY VERBS
LEXICON V-AUX-NEG-PRT1_АШЕЗЬ !!= @CODE@ ашезь:аш
 V-AUX-NEG-PRT1 ;
+V+Aux+Neg: IND-PRT2-ALL ;
+V+Aux+Neg@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:000@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ IND-PRT1-ALL-BUT-Sc3 ;
+V+Aux+Neg:езь  IND-PRT1-30_ZERO ;
+V+Aux+Neg:езь  IND-PRT1-60_Т ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1:ень # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2:еть # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3:езь # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1:еме # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2:еде # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3:есть # ;

LEXICON V-AUX-NEG-PRT1_ИЗЬ !!= @CODE@ изь:изь
 V-AUX-NEG-PRT1 ;
+V+Aux+Neg: IND-PRT2-ALL ;
+V+Aux+Neg@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:000@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ IND-PRT1-ALL-BUT-Sc3 ;
+V+Aux+Neg:  IND-PRT1-30_ZERO ;
+V+Aux+Neg:  IND-PRT1-60_Т ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1:ень # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2:еть # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3:езь # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1:еме # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2:еде # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3:%^Devoice%^Ь2ZERO%>ть # ;

LEXICON V-AUX-NEG-PRT1
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg2:ихтень # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3:ине # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3:ине # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3:ить # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3:ить # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3:езень # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3:езе # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3:еськ # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3:еськ # ;

+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg1:емайть # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl1:емаcmь # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg1:емаcmь # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl1:емаcmь # ;

+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl2:едезь # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg2:едезь # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl2:едезь # ;

+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl2:едезь # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg2:едезь # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl2:едезь # ;

+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg1:емань # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl1:емазь # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg1:емазь # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl1:емазь # ;

+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl1:емезь # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg1:емезь # ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl1:емезь # ;


! Finite forms

!! FROM MYV
